Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201684-906.04
Secretary of State; maintain docket for pending proceedings; contents.

(1) The Secretary of State shall maintain a current public rulemaking or regulationmaking docket for each pending rulemaking or regulationmaking proceeding. A rulemaking or regulationmaking proceeding is pending from the time it is commenced by publication of a notice of proposed rule or regulation making to the time it is terminated by publication of a notice of termination or the rule or regulation becoming effective.

(2) For each rulemaking or regulationmaking proceeding, the docket shall indicate:

(a) The subject matter of the proposed rule or regulation;

(b) The time, date, and location of the public hearing regarding the proposed rule or regulation;

(c) The name and address of agency personnel with whom people may communicate regarding the proposed rule or regulation;

(d) Where written comments on the proposed rule or regulation may be inspected;

(e) The time during which written comments may be made;

(f) Where the description of the fiscal impact may be inspected and obtained;

(g) The current status of the proposed rule or regulation and any agency determinations with respect thereto;

(h) Any known timetable for agency decisions or other action in the proceeding;

(i) The date of the rule's or regulation's adoption;

(j) The date of the rule's or regulation's filing, indexing, and publication; and

(k) The operative date of the rule or regulation if such date is later than the effective date prescribed in sections 84-906 and 84-911.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB867, § 10.
January 1, 2017